Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4903
License; requirements.

No person shall act in the capacity of a managing general agent with respect to risks located in this state for an insurer licensed in this state unless such person is licensed in accordance with the Insurance Producers Licensing Act. No person shall act in the capacity of a managing general agent representing an insurer domiciled in this state with respect to risks located outside this state unless such person is licensed in accordance with such act.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 114;

Laws 2006, LB 875, § 8.

Insurance Producers Licensing Act, see section 44-4047.